Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1275
Legal notices; proof of posting or service.

The posting or service of any notice or other paper required by law may be proved by the affidavit of any competent witness, attached to a copy of said notice or paper, and made within six months of the time of such posting.

R.S.1867, Code § 404, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 7968;

C.S.1922, § 8909;

C.S.1929, § 20-1275;

R.S.1943, § 25-1275.

Proof by affidavit of posting of public notice is not exclusive. Larimer v. Wallace, 36 Neb. 444, 54 N.W. 835 (1893).